Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 12.1. Virginia Juvenile Community Crime Control Act.

§ 16.1-309.2.
Purpose and intent.

The General Assembly, to ensure the prevention of juvenile crime and the imposition of appropriate and just sanctions and to make the most efficient use of community diversion and community-based and correctional resources for those juveniles who have been screened for needing community diversion or community-based services using an evidence-based assessment protocol or are before intake on complaints or the court on petitions alleging that the juvenile is a child in need of services, child in need of supervision, or delinquent, has determined that it is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to establish a community-based system of progressive intensive sanctions and services that correspond to the severity of offense and treatment needs. The purpose of this system shall be to deter crime by providing community diversion or community-based services to juveniles who are in need of such services and by providing an immediate, effective punishment that emphasizes accountability of the juvenile offender for his actions as well as reduces the pattern of repeat offending. In furtherance of this purpose, counties, cities or combinations thereof are encouraged to develop, implement, operate, and evaluate programs and services responsive to their specific juvenile offender needs and juvenile crime trends.

This article shall be interpreted and construed to accomplish the following purposes:

Promote an adequate level of services to be available to every juvenile and domestic relations district court.

Ensure local autonomy and flexibility in addressing juvenile crime.

Encourage a public and private partnership in the design and delivery of services for juveniles who come before intake on a complaint or the court on a petition alleging a child is in need of services, in need of supervision, or delinquent or have been screened for needing community diversion or community-based services using an evidence-based assessment protocol.

Emphasize parental responsibility and provide community-based services for juveniles and their families which hold them accountable for their behavior.

Establish a locally driven statewide planning process for the allocation of state resources.

Promote the development of an adequate service capacity for juveniles before intake on a complaint or the court on petitions alleging status or delinquent offenses.

History.

1995, cc. 698, 840; 1996, cc. 671, 682; 2019, c. 105.

Cross references.

As to the availability of confidential medical and mental health records of children maintained by the Department of Juvenile Justice, see §

16.1-300

. As to purchases made for the administration of programs under this act being exempt from the Virginia Public Procurement Act, see §

2.2-4345

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, cc. 698 and 840, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 1996, if state funds are provided to carry out the purposes of this act during the 1995 Session of the General Assembly.” These funds were provided pursuant to Acts 1995, c. 853, item 578.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 422 E 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

16.1-309.2

through

16.1-309.10

, Code of Virginia, the Board of Juvenile Justice shall establish guidelines for use in determining the types of programs for which VJCCCA funding may be expended. The department shall establish a format to receive biennial or annual requests for funding from localities, based on these guidelines. For each program requested, the plan shall document the need for the program, goals, and measurable objectives, and a budget for the proposed expenditure of these funds and any other resources to be committed by localities.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 105, in the first paragraph, inserted “the prevention of juvenile crime and,” “community diversion and community-based and” and “who have been screened for needing community diversion or community-based services using an evidence-based assessment protocol or are” in the first sentence and inserted “community diversion or community-based services to juveniles who are in need of such services and by providing an” in the second sentence; in subdivision 3, added “or have been screened for needing community diversion or community-based services using an evidence-based assessment protocol” at the end.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For a book review, “Random Violence and the Transformation of the Juvenile Justice Debate,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1095 (2000).

§ 16.1-309.3.
Establishment of a community-based system of services; biennial local plan; quarterly report.

Any county, city, or combination thereof may establish a community-based system pursuant to this article, which shall provide, or arrange to have accessible, a variety of predispositional and postdispositional services. These services may include, but are not limited to, diversion, community service, restitution, house arrest, intensive juvenile supervision, substance abuse assessment and testing, first-time offender programs, intensive individual and family treatment, structured day treatment and structured residential programs, aftercare/parole community supervision, and residential and nonresidential services for juveniles who have been screened for needing community diversion or community-based services using an evidence-based assessment protocol or juvenile offenders who are before intake on complaints or the court on petitions alleging that the juvenile is delinquent, in need of services, or in need of supervision but shall not include secure detention for the purposes of this article. Such community-based systems shall be based on an annual review of court-related data and an objective assessment of the need for services and programs for juveniles who have been screened for needing community diversion or community-based services using an evidence-based assessment protocol or juvenile offenders who are before intake on complaints or the court on petitions alleging that the juvenile is a child in need of services, in need of supervision, or delinquent. The community-based system shall be developed after consultation with the judge or judges of the juvenile and domestic relations district court, the director of the court services unit, the community policy and management team established under §

2.2-5205

, and, if applicable, the director of any program established pursuant to §

66-26

.

Community-based services instituted pursuant to this article shall be administered by a county, city, or combination thereof and may be administered through a community policy and management team established under §

2.2-5204

or a commission established under §

16.1-315

. Such programs and services may be provided by qualified public or private agencies, pursuant to appropriate contracts. Any commission established under §

16.1-315

providing predispositional and postdispositional services prior to the enactment of this article which serves the City of Chesapeake or the City of Hampton shall directly receive the proportion of funds calculated under §

16.1-309.7

on behalf of the owner localities. The funds received shall be allocated directly to the member localities. Any member locality which elects to withdraw from the commission shall be entitled to its full allocation as provided in §§

16.1-309.6

and

16.1-309.7

. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall provide technical assistance to localities, upon request, for establishing or expanding programs or services pursuant to this article.

Funds provided to implement the provisions of this article shall not be used to supplant funds established as the state pool of funds under §

2.2-5211

.

Any county, city, or combination thereof which establishes a community-based system pursuant to this article shall biennially submit to the State Board for approval a local plan for the development, implementation, and operation of such services, programs, and facilities pursuant to this article. The plan shall provide (i) the projected number of juveniles served by alternatives to secure detention and (ii) any reduction in secure detention rates and commitments to state care as a result of programs funded pursuant to this article. The State Board shall solicit written comments on the plan from the judge or judges of the juvenile and domestic relations court, the director of the court services unit, and, if applicable, the director of programs established pursuant to §

66-26

. Prior to the initiation of any new services, the plan shall also include a cost comparison for the private operation of such services.

Each locality shall report quarterly to the Director the data required by the Department to measure progress on stated objectives and to evaluate programs and services within such locality’s plan.

History.

1995, cc. 698, 840; 1996, cc. 671, 682; 1997, c. 347; 2000, cc. 195, 806; 2007, c. 813; 2019, c. 105.

Cross references.

As to the powers and duties of the community policy and management team under the Children’s Services Act, see §

2.2-5206

.

As to programs developed under the Delinquency Prevention and Youth Development Act pursuant to this article, see §

66-35

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 195 deleted “during the period fiscal year 1995 through fiscal year 2000” preceding “the proportion of funds” in the third sentence of subsection B, and at the beginning of the fourth sentence of subsection B.

The 2000 amendment by c. 806 inserted the language beginning “based on an annual” through the end of the present third sentence in subsection A; in the present fourth sentence of subsection A, inserted “The community-based system shall be” at the beginning of the sentence, deleted “and” following “unit,” and added the language following “§ 2.1-751” through the end of the sentence; in subsection B, deleted “during the period fiscal year 1995 through fiscal year 2000” preceding “the proportion” in the third sentence, and deleted “During the period fiscal year 1995 through fiscal year 2000,” at the beginning of the fourth sentence; in subsection D added the second sentence, and in the third sentence, deleted “and” preceding “the director,” and added “and if applicable, the director of programs established pursuant to §

66-26

; and in subsection E substituted “data required by the Department to measure progress on stated objectives and to evaluate programs and services” for “number of child-care days registered during the preceding quarter by each juvenile correctional program or facility operated.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “the City of Chesapeake or the City of Hampton” for “a member jurisdiction that is a city having a population between 135,000 and 165,000” in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 105, in subsection A, inserted “juveniles who have been screened for needing community diversion or community-based services using an evidence-based assessment protocol or” in the second sentence and inserted “who have been screened for needing community diversion or community-based services using an evidence-based assessment protocol or juvenile offenders who are” in the third sentence.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Referring juvenile for services. —

A family assessment and planning team may not refer a juvenile for services funded under the Juvenile Community Crime Control Act (JCA), which is a voluntary program, when funding under the Comprehensive Services Act for At-Risk Youth and Families (CSA), which is a mandatory program, is available for such purposes and, when a juvenile is eligible under both JCA and CSA for services that have not yet been funded by either act, the local family assessment and planning team may not refer the juvenile for services funded under JCA rather than CSA. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Robert W. Bendall, City Attorney for the City of Manassas, 00-034, 2000 Va. AG LEXIS 41 (7/28/00).

§ 16.1-309.4.
Statewide plan for juvenile services.

It shall be the duty of the Department of Juvenile Justice to devise, develop and promulgate a statewide plan for the establishment and maintenance of a range of institutional and community-based, diversion, predispositional and postdispositional services to be reasonably accessible to each court. The Department shall be responsible for the collection and dissemination of the required court data necessary for the development of the plan. The plan shall utilize the information provided by local plans submitted under §

16.1-309.3

. The plan shall be submitted to the Board on or before July 1 in odd-numbered years. The plan shall include a biennial forecast with appropriate annual updates as may be required of future juvenile correctional center and detention home needs.

History.

1995, cc. 698, 840; 1996, cc. 671, 682, 755, 914.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and substituted “juvenile correctional center” for “learning center” near the middle of the last sentence.

§ 16.1-309.5.
Construction, etc., of detention homes and other facilities; reimbursement in part by Commonwealth.

The Commonwealth shall reimburse any county, city or any combination thereof for one-half the cost of construction, enlargement, renovation, purchase or rental of a detention home or other facilities the plans and specifications of which were approved by the Board and the Governor in accordance with the provisions of subsection C of this section.

The construction, renovation, purchase, rental, maintenance and operation of a detention home or other facilities established by a county, city or any combination thereof and the necessary expenses incurred in operating such facilities shall be the responsibility of the county, city or any combination thereof.

The Board shall promulgate regulations to include criteria to serve as guidelines in evaluating requests for such reimbursements and to ensure the geographically equitable distribution of state funds provided for such purpose. Priority funding shall be given to multijurisdictional initiatives. No such reimbursement for costs of construction shall be made, however, unless the plans and specifications, including the need for additional personnel therefor, have been submitted to the Governor and the construction has been approved by him. Such reimbursement shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of funds appropriated to the Department. In the event that a county or city requests and receives financial assistance from other public fund sources outside the provisions of this law, the total financial assistance and reimbursement shall not exceed the total construction cost of the project exclusive of land and site improvement costs, and such funds shall not be considered state funds.

History.

1995, cc. 698, 840; 2000, cc. 562, 601.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, cc. 562 and 601, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to projects completed on and after July 1, 2001.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 562 and 601, effective July 1, 2000, and applicable to projects completed on and after July 1, 2001, are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “one-half” for “up to one-half”; substituted “the plans and specifications of which were” for “upon a basis”; substituted “the Board and the Governor” for “the Board”; and substituted “of subsection C of this section” for “of this section.”

§ 16.1-309.6.
How state appropriations for operating costs of Juvenile Community Crime Control Act programs determined; notice of financial aid.

The Governor’s proposed biennial budget shall include, for each fiscal year, an appropriation for operating costs for Juvenile Community Crime Control Act programs. The proposed appropriation shall include amounts for compensating counties, cities and combinations thereof which elect to establish a system of community-based services pursuant to this article. Upon approval pursuant to the provisions of this article, any county, city or combination thereof which utilized predispositional or postdispositional block grant services or programs in fiscal year 1995 shall contribute an amount not less than the sum of its fiscal year 1995 expenditures for child care day placements in predispositional and postdispositional block grant alternatives to secure detention for implementation of its local plan. Such amount shall not include any expenditures in fiscal year 1995 for secure detention and placements made pursuant to §

2.2-5211

.

The Department shall review annually the costs of operating services, programs and facilities pursuant to this article and recommend adjustments to maintain the Commonwealth’s proportionate share. The Department shall no later than the fifteenth day following adjournment sine die of the General Assembly provide each county and city an estimate of funds appropriated pursuant to this article.

History.

1995, cc. 698, 840; 1996, cc. 671, 682; 1998, c. 54.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 422 E 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The appropriation for Financial Assistance for Community Based Alternative Treatment Services includes $10,379,926 the first year and $10,379,926 the second year from the general fund for the implementation of the financial assistance provisions of the Juvenile Community Crime Control Act (VJCCCA), §§

16.1-309.2

through

16.1-309.10

, Code of Virginia. Notwithstanding §

16.1-309.6

, Code of Virginia, localities participating in this program and contributing through their local match an amount of local funds which is greater than they receive from the Commonwealth under this program are authorized, but not required, to provide a contribution greater than the state general fund contribution. In no case shall their local match be less than their state share.”

The 1998 amendment,

in the first paragraph, in the third sentence deleted “beginning in fiscal year 1996” following “shall contribute,” substituted “not less than” for “equal to,” and inserted “child care day placements in,” and added “and placements made pursuant to § 2.1-757” in the last sentence.

§ 16.1-309.7.
Determination of payment.

The Commonwealth shall provide financial assistance to localities whose plans have been approved pursuant to subsection D of §

16.1-309.3

in quarterly payments based on the annual calculated costs which shall be determined as follows:

For community diversion services, one-half of the calculated costs as determined by the following factors: (i) the statewide daily average costs for predispositional nonresidential services and (ii) the total number of children in need of services and children in need of supervision complaints diverted at intake by the locality in the previous year and the total number of children who have been screened for needing community diversion or community-based services using an evidence-based assessment protocol.

For predispositional community-based services, three-quarters of the calculated costs as determined by the following factors: (i) the statewide daily average cost evenly divided for predispositional community-based residential and nonresidential services and (ii) the number of arrests of juveniles based on the locality’s most recent year available Uniform Crime Reports for (a) one-third of all Part 1 crimes against property, (b) one-third of all drug offenses and (c) all remaining Part 2 arrests.

For postdispositional community-based services for adjudicated juveniles, one-half of the calculated costs as determined by the following factors: (i) the statewide average daily costs for postdispositional community-based nonresidential services and (ii) the locality’s total number of juveniles, who, in the previous year, were adjudicated delinquent for the first time.

For postdispositional community-based services for juveniles adjudicated delinquent for a second or subsequent offense, one-half of the calculated costs as determined by the following factors: (i) the statewide average daily costs evenly divided for postdispositional community-based residential and nonresidential services and (ii) the locality’s total number of court dispositions which, in the previous year, adjudicated juveniles as (a) delinquent for a second or subsequent offense, (b) children in need of services, or (c) children in need of supervision, less those juveniles receiving services under the provisions of §§

16.1-285.1

and

16.1-286

.

Any moneys distributed by the Commonwealth under this article which are unexpended at the end of each fiscal year within a biennium shall be retained by the county, city or combination thereof and subsequently expended for operating expenses of Juvenile Community Crime Control Act programs. Any surplus funds remaining at the end of a biennium shall be returned to the state treasury.

History.

1995, cc. 698, 840; 1996, cc. 820, 970; 2019, c. 105.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 422 E 3, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides:

“a. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

16.1-309.7

B, Code of Virginia, unobligated VJCCCA funds must be returned to the department by each grantee locality no later than October 1 of the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which they were received, or a similar amount may be withheld from the current fiscal year’s periodic payments designated by the department for that locality. The Director, Department of Planning and Budget, may increase the general fund appropriation for this Item up to the amount of unobligated VJCCCA funds returned to the Department of Juvenile Justice.

“b. All such unobligated and reappropriated balances shall be used by the department for the purpose of awarding short-term supplementary grants to localities, for programs and services which have been demonstrated to improve outcomes, including reduced recidivism, of juvenile offenders. Such programs and services must augment and support current VJCCCA-funded programs within each affected locality. The grantee locality shall submit an outcomes report to the department, in accord with a written memorandum of agreement which shall accompany the supplementary grant award. This provision shall apply to funds obligated to and in the possession of the department and its grant recipients. The entity which returns unobligated funds under this provision shall not have a presumptive entitlement to a supplementary grant.

“c. The Department of Juvenile Justice, with the assistance of the Department of Corrections, the Virginia Council on Juvenile Detention, juvenile court service unit directors, juvenile and domestic relations district court judges, and juvenile justice advocacy groups, shall provide a report on the types of programs supported by the Juvenile Community Crime Control Act and whether the youth participating in such programs are statistically less likely to be arrested, adjudicated or convicted, or incarcerated for either misdemeanors or crimes that would otherwise be considered felonies if committed by an adult.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 105 added “and the total number of children who have been screened for needing community diversion or community-based services using an evidence-based assessment protocol” at the end of subdivision A 1.

§ 16.1-309.8.
Costs of maintenance of juveniles in Community Crime Control Act programs.

Any county, city or combination thereof operating a Juvenile Community Crime Control Act program may collect from any locality of this Commonwealth from which a juvenile is placed in its program a daily rate calculated to allow the operating locality or localities to meet but not exceed the costs of providing services. Additionally, this rate may not be higher than the rate charged other counties, cities or combinations thereof using the same program.

History.

1995, cc. 698, 840; 1996, cc. 671, 682; 1998, c. 538.

The 1998 amendment,

in the first sentence, deleted the language following “daily rate” which formerly read: “which does not exceed the sum of the total daily operating costs less any state aid provided to the county, city, or combination thereof operating such program pursuant to the provisions of this article” and added the language beginning “calculated to allow,” and added the last sentence.

§ 16.1-309.9.
Establishment of standards; determination of compliance.

The State Board of Juvenile Justice shall develop, promulgate and approve standards for the development, implementation, operation and evaluation of the range of community-based programs, services and facilities authorized by this article. The State Board shall also approve minimum standards for the construction and equipment of detention homes or other facilities and for food, clothing, medical attention, and supervision of juveniles to be housed in these facilities and programs.

The State Board may prohibit, by its order, the placement of juveniles in any place of residence which does not comply with the minimum standards. It may limit the number of juveniles to be detained or housed in a detention home or other facility and may designate some other place of detention or housing for juveniles who would otherwise be held therein.

The Department shall periodically review all services established and annually review expenditures made under this article to determine compliance with the approved local plans and operating standards. If the Department determines that a program is not in substantial compliance with the approved plan or standards, the Department may suspend all or any portion of financial aid made available to the locality until there is compliance.

Orders of the State Board of Juvenile Justice shall be enforced by circuit courts as is provided for the enforcement of orders of the State Board of Local and Regional Jails under §

53.1-70

.

History.

1995, cc. 698, 840; 2020, c. 759.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by c. 759 substituted “Local and Regional Jails” for “Corrections” in subsection D.

§ 16.1-309.10.
Visitation and management of detention homes; other facilities; reports of superintendent.

In the event that a detention home, group home or other residential care facility for children in need of services or delinquent or alleged delinquent youth is established by a county, city, or any combination thereof, it shall be subject to visitation, inspection and regulation by the State Board or its agents, and shall be furnished and operated so far as possible as a family home under the management of a superintendent. It shall be the duty of the superintendent to furnish the Department such reports and other statistical data relating to the operation of such detention homes, group homes or other residential care facilities for children in need of services or delinquent or alleged delinquent youth as may be required by the Director.

History.

1995, cc. 698, 840.

§ 16.1-309.11.
Youth justice diversion program.

For the purposes of this section, “youth justice diversion program” means a diversionary program that (i) is monitored by a local youth justice diversion program advisory committee; (ii) uses juvenile volunteers as lawyers, jurors, and other court personnel; (iii) uses volunteer attorneys as judges; (iv) conducts peer trials of juveniles who are referred to the program by the intake officer; and (v) imposes various sentences emphasizing restitution, rehabilitation, accountability, competency building, and education, but not incarceration.

Any jurisdiction may establish a youth justice diversion program upon establishment of a local youth justice diversion program advisory committee and approval of the youth justice diversion program by the chief judge of the juvenile and domestic relations district court that serves such jurisdiction. Each local youth justice diversion program advisory committee shall ensure quality, efficiency, and fairness in the planning, implementation, and operation of the youth justice diversion program that serves the jurisdiction. Advisory committee membership may include, but shall not be limited to, the following persons or their designees: (i) a judge from the juvenile and domestic relations district court that serves such jurisdiction; (ii) the attorney for the Commonwealth; (iii) the public defender or a member of the local criminal defense bar in jurisdictions in which there is no public defender; (iv) the clerk of the court in which the youth justice diversion program is located; (v) a representative of the Department of Juvenile Justice from the local office that serves the jurisdiction; (vi) a local law-enforcement officer; (vii) a representative of a local school in such jurisdiction; (viii) a representative of juvenile court services; (ix) a representative of a juvenile detention center or group home; (x) a representative of a local children and family services agency; and (xi) any other persons selected by the local youth justice diversion program advisory committee.

Each local youth justice diversion program advisory committee shall establish criteria for the eligibility and participation of juveniles alleged to have committed a delinquent act other than an act that would be a felony or a Class 1 misdemeanor if committed by an adult in the youth justice diversion program, with the consent of the juvenile’s parent or legal guardian.

Each local youth justice diversion program advisory committee shall establish policies and procedures for the operation of the youth justice diversion program to attain the following goals: (i) early intervention in and prevention of delinquent behavior; (ii) providing positive alternative sanctions for offenders by providing a peer-driven sentencing mechanism that allows young people to take responsibility, to be held accountable, and to make restitution; (iii) advocating for fair, constructive, and restorative sentences predicated on sensitivity to the unique needs and the diversity of the participating juveniles; and (iv) developing positive citizenship attitudes, encouraging civic engagement, and promoting educational success through a diversity of service learning opportunities, strategies, and activities.

All records and reports concerning juvenile participants in a local youth justice diversion program made available to members of a local youth justice diversion program advisory committee and volunteers of a local youth justice diversion program and all records and reports identifying a juvenile participant that are generated by the committee or program from such reports shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed, except as authorized by other applicable law.

A juvenile referred to a youth justice diversion program may be required to contribute to the cost of the program pursuant to guidelines developed by the local youth justice diversion program advisory committee.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 457.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.